Maryland, session 2025, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
22–119.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection AND §
25–304 OF THIS ARTICLE, within the regional district, the zoning powers vested by
Division I of this article in a municipal corporation or the council of a municipal corporation
within the regional district shall be construed to be vested exclusively in the appropriate
district council.
(2) A municipal corporation in Prince George’s County has concurrent
jurisdiction with Prince George’s County to enforce zoning laws in the boundaries of the
municipal corporation.
(3) The power to enforce zoning laws for the City of Takoma Park and the
Town of Kensington is as provided in §§ 24–201 and 24–202 of this article, respectively.
(b) Before exercising the authority granted by this section, a municipal
corporation in Prince George’s County shall enter into a written agreement with the district
council concerning:
(1) the method by which the county will be advised of citations issued by a
municipal inspector;
(2) the responsibility of the municipal corporation or the county to
prosecute violations cited by the municipal corporation;
(3) the disposition of fines imposed for violations cited by the municipal
corporation;
(4) the resolution of disagreements between the municipal corporation and
the county about the interpretation of zoning laws; and
(5) any other matter that the district council considers necessary for the
proper exercise of the authority granted by this section.
25–101.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
25–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the district council may provide
that the governing body of a municipal corporation may exercise the powers of the district

HOUSE BILL 1231 3
council as specified in this subtitle.
(b) When exercising authority delegated under subsection (c) or (d) of this section,
the governing body of a municipal corporation:
(1) shall be subject to the substantive and procedural requirements and
standards established by the district council; and
(2) may not impose:
(i) with respect to general delegation under subsection (c) of this
section, a different requirement or standard than the requirements or standards that would
apply if the district council had not delegated its authority to the municipal corporation; or
(ii) with respect to delegation in a revitalization overlay zone under
subsection (d) of this section, a stricter requirement or standard than the requirements or
standards that would apply if the district council had not delegated its authority to the
municipal corporation.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to land in a municipal corporation in the
regional district.
(2) The district council may delegate to the governing body of a municipal
corporation the powers of the district council regarding:
(i) design standards;
(ii) parking and loading standards;
(iii) sign design standards;
(iv) lot size variances and setback and similar requirements;
(v) landscaping requirements;
(vi) certification, revocation, and revision of nonconforming uses;
(vii) minor changes to approved special exceptions;
(viii) vacation of municipal rights–of–way; and
(ix) except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, all
detailed site plans.
(3) The authority to delegate with regard to detailed site plans does not
apply to detailed site plans:

HOUSE BILL 1231
(i) for a zone that requires detailed site plan approval by the district
council;
(ii) that are required as a condition of approval of a zoning map
amendment or a preliminary plan of subdivision;
(iii) for which the approval of a conceptual site plan or a preliminary
plan of cluster subdivision is required; or
(iv) that are required for designated parcels as a specific condition of
a sectional map amendment.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to a revitalization overlay zone created by the
district council.
(2) For any portion of a revitalization overlay zone in a municipal
corporation, the district council may delegate to the governing body of a municipal
corporation the powers of the district council regarding:
(i) design standards;
(ii) parking and loading standards;
(iii) sign design standards;
(iv) lot size variances and setback and similar requirements; and
(v) landscaping requirements.
(3) The delegation of powers under paragraph (2) of this subsection may
not impede a development that meets the requirements the district council sets for the
revitalization overlay zone.
(4) For any portion of a revitalization overlay zone not within a municipal
corporation, the district council may authorize the county planning board to approve:
(i) departures from parking and loading standards;
(ii) departures from design standards; and
(iii) any variance from the zoning laws.
25–304.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFYING MUNICIPAL CORPORATION” MEANS A
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN THE REGIONAL DISTRICT IN THE COUNTY THAT HAS A
POPULATION OF AT LEAST 15,000 ACCORDING TO THE MOST RECENT UNITED

HOUSE BILL 1231 5
STATES CENSUS.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
GOVERNING BODY OF A QUALIFYING MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY BY
RESOLUTION EXERCISE THE POWERS OF THE COUNTY PLANNING BOARD, THE
ZONING HEARING EXAMINER FOR THE COUNTY, OR THE DISTRICT COUNCIL TO MAKE
LAND USE DECISIONS RELATING TO ANY LAND WITHIN THE CORPORATE LIMITS OF
THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(2) WHEN EXERCISING THE POWERS AUTHORIZED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A QUALIFYING
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE SUBSTANTIVE AND
PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THE COUNTY
ZONING LAW, INCLUDING THE REGULATIONS AND MAPS.
(3) THE POWERS GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION DO NOT AUTHORIZE
A GOVERNING BODY OF A QUALIFYING MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TO:
(I) AMEND THE COUNTY ZONING LAW; OR
(II) ADOPT A MUNICIPAL ZONING LAW.
(4) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF ADOPTION OF A
RESOLUTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A QUALIFYING MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE
RESOLUTION TO THE DISTRICT COUNCIL.
(C) A PARTY OF RECORD TO AN ACTION OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A
QUALIFYING MUNICIPAL CORPORATION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY SEEK JUDICIAL
REVIEW OF THE FINAL DECISION OF THE GOVERNING BODY TO THE CIRCUIT COURT
FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.